sv: Metallprodukter > Eltillbehör > Solenergipaket: Reservströmsenheter; Solcellsenheter kopplade till elnätet; Solcellsenheter ej kopplade till elnätet
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Elektros reikmenys > Saulės energijos rinkiniai: Atsarginio maitinimo rinkiniai; Su tinklu susieti saulės energijos rinkiniai; Autonominiai saulės energijos rinkiniai
ja: DIY用品 > 電力供給装置 > 太陽光発電システム: バックアップ電源キット; グリッドタイソーラーキット; オフグリッドソーラーキット
fi: Rakentaminen > Teholähteet ja sähkötarvikkeet > Aurinkoenergiasetit: Varavirtasarjat; Verkkoon kytketyt aurinkosetit; Muut kuin verkkoon kytketyt aurinkosetit
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Παροχή ρεύματος & ηλεκτρικά εξαρτήματα > Κιτ ηλιακής ενέργειας: Κιτ εφεδρικής ενέργειας; Ηλιακά κιτ συνδεδεμένα με το δίκτυο; Ηλιακά κιτ εκτός δικτύου
sk-SK: Náradie > Dodávka elektrickej energie > Súpravy solárnej energie: Záložné napájacie súpravy; Mriežkové solárne súpravy; Nemriežkové solárne súpravy
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Energie- en elektriciteitsbenodigdheden > Zonne-energiekits: Back-upvoedingskits; Netgekoppelde zonnekits; Autonome zonnekits
zh-TW: 硬體 > 供電用品 > 太陽能套件: 備用電源套件; 併網太陽能套件; 離網太陽能套件
en: Hardware > Power & Electrical Supplies > Solar Energy Kits: Backup Power Kits; Grid-Tied Solar Kits; Off-Grid Solar Kits
bg-BG: Железария > Захранване и електрически консумативи > Комплекти за слънчева енергия: Слънчеви резервни комплекти; Комплекти за слънчево захранване в мрежа; Комплекти за автономно слънчево захранване
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Napajanje in električna oprema > Kompleti za sončno energijo: Kompleti za rezervno napajanje; Kompleti za sončno energijo, vezani na omrežje; Otočne sončne elektrarne
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Системы электроснабжения > Наборы для солнечного электроснабжения: Наборы для резервного солнечного электроснабжения; Наборы для сетевого солнечного электроснабжения; Наборы для автономного солнечного электроснабжения
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Forniture elettriche > Kit fotovoltaici: Kit di alimentazione di backup; Kit solari collegati alla rete; Kit solari fuori rete
fr: Quincaillerie > Accessoires électriques > Kits d’énergie solaire: Kits d’alimentation de secours; Kits solaires connectés au réseau; Kits solaires hors réseau
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 电动/电气用品 > 太阳能组件: 备用电源组件; 并网太阳能组件; 离网太阳能组件
hu: Hardver > Tápellátás és elektromos kellékek > Napenergia-készletek: Tartalék tápkészletek; Hálózatra kötött szolárkészletek; Hálózaton kívüli szolárkészletek
vi: Phần cứng > Nguồn & Cấp điện > Bộ pin năng lượng mặt trời: Bộ nguồn dự phòng; Bộ năng lượng mặt trời hòa lưới; Bộ năng lượng mặt trời độc lập
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Elektroinstalace > Sady solárních panelů: Sady pro záložní napájení; Sady pro solární systémy připojené k elektrické síti; Sady pro ostrovní solární systémy
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Elektrobedarf > Solarenergie-Kits: Reserveleistungskits; Netzgekoppelte Solar-Kits; Netzunabhängige Solar-Kits
pt-BR: Ferragens > Suprimentos elétricos > Kits de energia solar: Kits de energia reserva; Kits solares ligados à rede; Kits solares fora da rede
tr: Hırdavat > Elektrik Sarf Malzemeleri > Güneş Enerjisi Kitleri: Yedek Güç Kitleri; Şebekeye Bağlı Güneş Kitleri; Şebekeden Bağımsız Güneş Kitleri
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > อุปกรณ์ที่ใช้ไฟฟ้า > ชุดพลังงานแสงอาทิตย์: ชุดไฟสำรอง; ชุดพลังงานแสงอาทิตย์แบบออนกริด; ชุดพลังงานแสงอาทิตย์ออฟกริด
da: Isenkram > Eludstyr > Solenergisæt: Reservestrømsæt; Gitterbundne solcellesæt; Off-grid solcellesæt
ro-RO: Feronerie > Articole și consumabile de alimentare și electrice > Seturi energie solară: Seturi de alimentare de rezervă; Seturi solare legate la rețea; Seturi solare fără legare la rețea
pt-PT: Equipamento > Artigos de potência e alimentação elétrica > Kits de energia solar: Kits de energia de reserva; Kits solares ligados à rede; Kits solares desligados da rede
nb: Maskinvare > Strøm- og elektrisk utstyr > Sett for solenergi: Reservestrømsett; Nettilkoblede solsett; Frakoblede solsett
pl: Sprzęt > Materiały elektryczne > Zestawy do instalacji słonecznych: Zestawy zasilania awaryjnego; Zestawy do instalacji słonecznych połączone z siecią; Zestawy do instalacji słonecznych niepołączone z siecią
es: Bricolaje > Suministros eléctricos > Kits de energía solar: Kits de energía de respaldo; Kits solares conectados a la red; Kits solares fuera de la red
hr-HR: Željezarija > Elektroinstalacijska oprema > Kompleti za solarnu energiju: Kompleti rezervnog napajanja; Solarni kompleti povezani s mrežom; Izvanmrežni solarni kompleti
ko: 철물 > 전원/전기 용품 > 태양광 세트: 예비 전력 세트; 전력망 연계 태양광 세트; 독립형 태양광 세트